Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1123.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 11-594, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE11-594. Powers and duties of county medical examiner A. The county medical examiner or alternate medical examiner shall direct a death investigation and, on a determination that the circumstances of the death provide jurisdiction pursuant to section 11-593, subsection B, shall: 1. Take charge of the dead body. 2. Determine if an autopsy is required. 3. Certify to the cause and manner of death following completion of the death investigation, reduce the findings to writing and promptly make a full report on forms prescribed for that purpose. 4. Have subpoena authority for all documents, records and papers deemed useful in the death investigation. 5. Execute a death certificate provided by the state registrar of vital statistics indicating the cause and the manner of death for those bodies for which a death investigation has been conducted and jurisdiction is assumed. 6. Give approval for cremation or alkaline hydrolysis of a dead body after a death investigation and record the approval on the death certificate. 7. Notify the county attorney or other law enforcement authority when death is found to be from nonnatural causes. 8. Carry out the duties specified under section 28-668. 9. Carry out the duties specified under title 36, chapter 7, article 3. 10. Provide a blood sample from a deceased person for the purpose of communicable disease testing pursuant to sections 13-1210 and 36-670 if the blood is available and the collection or release will not interfere with a medical examination, autopsy or certification of death. 11. Observe all policies adopted by the board of supervisors regarding conflicts of interest and disclosure of noncounty employment. B. The county medical examiner or alternate medical examiner may: 1. Assign to a medical death investigator or other qualified personnel all aspects of a death investigation except performing autopsies. 2. Authorize forensic pathologists to perform examinations and autopsies. The medical examiner or alternate medical examiner may authorize medical students or residents and fellows in pathology training to perform autopsies under the supervision of a licensed physician who is board certified trained in forensic pathology, pursuant to procedures adopted by the county medical examiner or alternate medical examiner.  Authorization and the amount to be paid by the county for pathology services are subject to approval of the board of supervisors. 3. Authorize pathologist assistants to assist with performing autopsies under the direct supervision of a licensed physician who is board certified in forensic pathology, pursuant to procedures adopted by the county medical examiner or alternate medical examiner.  A pathologist assistant may not certify a cause of death or independently perform an autopsy. 4. Delegate any power, duty or function, whether ministerial or discretionary, vested by this chapter in the medical examiner or alternate medical examiner to a person meeting the qualifications prescribed in this chapter who is employed by or who has contracted with the county to provide death investigation services. The medical examiner or alternate medical examiner shall be responsible for the official acts of the person designated pursuant to this section and shall act under the name and authority of the medical examiner or alternate medical examiner. 5. Authorize the taking of organs and tissues as they prove to be usable for transplants, other treatment, therapy, education or research if all of the requirements of title 36, chapter 7, article 3 are met. The medical examiner or alternate medical examiner shall give this authorization within a time period that allows a medically viable donation. 6. Authorize licensed physicians, surgeons or trained technicians to remove parts of bodies provided they follow an established protocol approved by the medical examiner or alternate medical examiner. 7. Limit the removal of organs or tissues for transplants or other therapy or treatment if, based on a review of available medical and investigative information within a time that allows a medically viable donation, the medical examiner or alternate medical examiner makes an initial determination that their removal would interfere with a medical examination, autopsy or certification of death. Before making a final decision to limit the removal of organs, the medical examiner or alternate medical examiner shall consult with the organ procurement organization. After the consultation and when the organ procurement organization provides information that the organ procurement organization reasonably believes could alter the initial decision and at the request of the organ procurement organization, the medical examiner or alternate medical examiner shall conduct a physical examination of the body. If the medical examiner or alternate medical examiner limits the removal of organs, the medical examiner or alternate medical examiner shall maintain documentation of this decision and shall make the documentation available to the organ procurement organization. C. A county medical examiner or alternate medical examiner shall not be held civilly or criminally liable for any acts performed in good faith pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 10 and subsection B, paragraphs 5, 6 and 7 of this section. D. If a dispute arises over the findings of the medical examiner's report, the medical examiner, on an order of the superior court, shall make available all evidence and documentation to a court-designated licensed forensic pathologist for review, and the results of the review shall be reported to the superior court in the county issuing the order. E. For providing external examinations and autopsies pursuant to this section, the medical examiner may charge a fee established by the board of supervisors pursuant to section 11-251.08. F. The county medical examiner or alternate medical examiner is entitled to all medical records and related records of a person for whom the medical examiner is required to certify cause of death. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 32-3207, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE32-3207. Disease hazard; suspected significant exposure; testing; petition; notice of results; definition A. A health professional may petition the court to allow for the testing of a patient or deceased person if there is probable cause to believe that in the course of that health professional's practice there was a significant exposure. B. The court shall hear the a petition filed pursuant to subsection a of this section promptly.  If the court finds that probable cause exists to believe that significant exposure occurred between the patient or deceased person and the health professional, the court shall order that either: 1. The person who transferred blood or bodily fluids onto the health professional provide two specimens of blood for testing. 2. If the person is deceased, the medical examiner draw two specimens of blood for testing. C. On written notice from the employer of the health professional, the medical examiner or person authorized to perform the duties of a medical examiner, including a medical student, resident or fellow in pathology training under the supervision of a licensed physician who is trained in forensic pathology, is authorized to draw two specimens of blood for testing during the autopsy or other examination of the deceased person's body.  The medical examiner or person authorized to perform the duties of the medical examiner shall release the specimen to the employing agency or entity for testing only after the court issues its order pursuant to subsection B of this section. If the court does not issue an order within thirty days after the medical examiner or person authorized to perform the duties of the medical examiner collects the specimen, the medical examiner shall destroy the specimen. D. Notice of the test results shall be provided as prescribed by the department of health services to the person tested, the health professional named in the petition and the health professional's employer.  If the person tested is incarcerated or detained, the notice shall also be provided to the chief medical officer of the facility in which the person is incarcerated or detained. E. For the purposes of this section, "significant exposure" means contact of a person's ruptured or broken skin or mucous membranes with another person's blood or bodily fluid, other than tears, saliva or perspiration, of a magnitude that the united states centers for disease control of the United States public health service and prevention have epidemiologically demonstrated can result in the transmission of blood borne bloodborne or bodily fluid carried diseases. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 36-831, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE36-831. Duty for funeral and disposition arrangements; waiver of decision-making; counties; civil liability; costs; veterans; immunity; definitions A. Except as provided pursuant to in subsection I or J of this section, the duty of burying the body of or providing other funeral and disposition arrangements for a dead person decedent devolves in the following order: 1. If the dead person decedent was married, on the surviving spouse unless: (a) The dead person decedent was legally separated from the person's spouse. (b) A petition for divorce or for legal separation from the dead person's decedent's spouse was filed before the person's death and remains pending at the time of death. 2. On the person who is designated as having power of attorney for the decedent in the decedent's most recent health care power of attorney pursuant to chapter 32, article 2 of this title if that power of attorney specifically gives that person the authority to make decisions regarding the disposition of the decedent's remains or a durable power of attorney if that power of attorney specifically gives that person the authority to make decisions regarding the disposition of the decedent's remains. 3. If the dead person decedent was a minor, on the parents. 4. On the adult children of the dead person decedent. 5. On the dead person's decedent's parent. 6. On the dead person's decedent's adult sibling. 7. On the dead person's decedent's adult grandchild. 8. On the dead person's decedent's grandparent. 9. On an adult who exhibited special care and concern for the dead person decedent. 10. On the person who was acting as the guardian of the person of the dead person decedent at the time of death. 11. On any other person who has the authority to dispose of the dead person's decedent's body. 12. If none of the persons named in paragraphs 1 through 11 of this subsection is financially capable of providing for the burial or other funeral and disposition arrangements,  or cannot be located on reasonable inquiry, on any person or fraternal, charitable or religious organization willing to assume responsibility. 13. If the dead person decedent was a prisoner in the custody of the state department of corrections at the time of death and none of the persons named in paragraphs 1 through 11 of this subsection is willing to provide for the burial or other funeral and disposition arrangements,  or cannot be located on reasonable inquiry, on the state department of corrections. B. During a person's life, the person's family members that are listed in subsection A of this section may sign a waiver of decision making decision-making that waives their rights under this section relating to the disposition of the person's body when the person dies. C. If none of the persons named in subsection A of this section is willing or financially able to bury or provide other funeral and disposition arrangements for a dead deceased person, or if the person cannot be located after reasonable efforts have been made to do so, the county in which death occurs shall bury or place in a permanent care crypt the dead body or cremated remains of a dead body. The county officer who is responsible for determining financial eligibility or abandonment may conduct an investigation for that purpose. If the decedent is known to be an honorably discharged veteran or the surviving spouse of an honorably discharged veteran, the county shall notify the United States department of veterans affairs or a local veteran's organization, or both, of the death and give the department or that organization the opportunity to provide for the person's burial or for other funeral and disposition arrangements.  If the department or organization is unable to provide for the burial of the veteran or the surviving spouse, the county shall ensure that the decedent is properly interred and that burial is made in a veterans' cemetery or a portion of a cemetery that is designated for the burial of veterans and spouses of veterans. D. If there is more than one member of a category listed in subsection A, paragraph 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8 or 9 of this section entitled to serve as the authorizing agent, final arrangements may be made by any member of that category unless that member knows of any objection by another member of the category.  If an objection is known, final arrangements shall be made by a majority of the members of the category who are reasonably available. E. If the county medical examiner or person performing authorized to perform the duties of the county medical examiner, including a medical student, resident or fellow in pathology training under the supervision of a licensed physician who is trained in forensic pathology, knows that the dead person deceased is a member of a federally recognized Native American tribe located in this state, the county medical examiner or person performing authorized to perform the duties of the county medical examiner must notify the tribe and give the tribe the opportunity to provide for the person's burial or other funeral and disposition arrangements. If an autopsy is required by section 11-597, the county medical examiner or person performing authorized to perform the duties of the county medical examiner, if possible, shall complete the autopsy and return the remains to the federally recognized Native American tribe located in this state within four calendar days after the determined date of death. F. A person on whom the duty prescribed in subsection A of this section is imposed who omits or is unwilling to perform that duty within a reasonable time or is prohibited from performing that duty under subsection I of this section is liable to the person performing the duty in an amount of two times the expenses the person incurred in providing for the burial or other funeral and disposition arrangements. The person who performs this duty may recover this amount in a civil action. G. Notwithstanding the probate requirements of title 14, if a county is required to bury a person pursuant to subsection C of this section, the county may recover the burial costs from the decedent's estate. The county may record a lien on the decedent's estate, and the lien takes priority over a beneficiary deed.  A financial institution in possession of that possesses monies in an account in the decedent's name must reimburse the county for the burial costs on presentation by the county of an affidavit that certifies: 1. The date of the decedent's death. 2. That, pursuant to this section, the county performed the decedent's burial. 3. The total burial costs incurred by the county. H. A person, a corporation or an agency of government that provides for the burial or other funeral and disposition arrangements on the instructions of a person described in subsection A of this section is immune from civil liability: 1. For failing to honor the wishes of the decedent or the wishes of a person who has a higher priority as prescribed in subsection A or C of this section if the person, corporation or agency of government was not aware, after reasonable inquiry, of the contrary wishes. 2. For refusing to follow conflicting directions of persons who have the same priority as prescribed in subsection A of this section. 3. For following directions of a personal representative that are consistent with the written testamentary instructions of the decedent. I. The duty to bury or to provide other funeral and disposition arrangements devolves to the next person in the order prescribed pursuant to in subsection A of this section if the person who is otherwise responsible for performing this duty is charged with the criminal death of the person to whom the duty is owed and the funeral director is aware of the charge.  The person who performs this duty may recover costs as prescribed in subsection F of this section. If the charges against the person on whom this duty originally fell are subsequently dismissed or are resolved in that person's favor on the merits, the person is responsible for only the actual costs. J. If the decedent died while serving in any branch of the United States armed forces, the United States reserve forces or the national guard, and completed a United States department of defense record of emergency data, DD form 93, or its successor form, the duty to bury the decedent or to provide other funeral and disposition arrangements for the decedent devolves on the person authorized by the decedent pursuant to that form. K. A person that possesses unclaimed cremated remains may release to the United States department of veterans affairs or a veterans' service organization verification information associated with the remains to verify whether the remains are of a veteran or a veteran's dependent who is eligible to be interred in a veterans' cemetery if the person has possessed the cremated remains for at least one year, a person described in subsection A of this section has not claimed the cremated remains and the person made a reasonable effort to locate a relative of the decedent to claim the remains. If the person receives notice from the United States department of veterans affairs or a veterans' service organization that the unclaimed cremated remains are the remains of a veteran or a veteran's dependent who is eligible to be interred in a veterans' cemetery, the person may transfer the cremated remains to a veterans' service organization, which must ensure that the cremated remains are interred in a veterans' cemetery or transport the cremated remains to a veterans' cemetery for burial. L. A person that releases verification information pursuant to subsection K of this section or that transfers cremated remains to a veterans' service organization or a veterans' cemetery pursuant to subsection K of this section is immune from civil liability for damages resulting from the release or transfer.  A veterans' service organization that inters cremated remains in or transports cremated remains to a veterans' cemetery pursuant to subsection K of this section is immune from civil liability for damages arising from the interment. M. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Person" includes a natural person, a corporation, a company, a partnership, a firm, an association, a society, the United States, this state, any territory, state or country, an Arizona federally recognized Native American tribe, any political subdivision of this state or a public or private corporation, a partnership or association or a veterans' service organization. 2. "Verification information": (a) Means data required by the United States department of veterans affairs to verify whether a person is a veteran or a veteran's dependent and is eligible for burial in a veterans' cemetery. , including (b) includes a copy of the person's death certificate and the person's name, service number, social security number, date of birth, date of death and place of birth. 3. "Veterans' service organization" means a veterans' organization that is chartered by the United States Congress, that is recognized by the United States department of veterans affairs or that qualifies as a charitable organization that is recognized under either section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(19) of the internal revenue code and that is organized for the verification and burial of veterans and their dependents. N. For the purposes of this article, "burial" includes cremation.END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR APRIL 13, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE APRIL 13, 2026.